extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.aff
FLAG long
SFX Va Y 3331
SFX Va ar es/vT [^gzcu]ar
SFX Va uar ues/vT [^g]uar
SFX Va guar gües/vT guar
SFX Va car ques/vT car
SFX Va gar gues/vT gar
SFX Va zar ces/vT zar
SFX Va ar a/LlvS ar
SFX Va ar amos ar
SFX Va ar ámos/XxV5V6 ar
SFX Va ar áis/V9V0 ar
SFX Va ar en/vS [^gqcu]ar
SFX Va uar uen/vS [^g]uar
SFX Va guar uen/vS guar
SFX Va car quen/vS car
SFX Va gar guen/vS gar
SFX Va zar cen/vS zar
SFX Va er o/LlvM [^ucü]er
SFX Va er o/LlvM [^qg]uer
SFX Va quer co/LlvM quer
SFX Va guer go/LlvM guer
SFX Va cer zo/LlvM cer
SFX Va üer uo/LlvM üer
SFX Va er es/vT er
SFX Va er e/LlvS [^lnrscaou]er
SFX Va er e/LlvS [^aeiou]ler
SFX Va er e/LlvS [^aeiou]ner
SFX Va er e/LlvS [^aeiou]rer
SFX Va er e/LlvS [^aeiou]ser
SFX Va er e/LlvS [^aeiou]cer
SFX Va ler l/V1vS [aeiou]ler
SFX Va ner n/V1vS [aeiou]ner
SFX Va rer r/V1vS [aeiou]rer
SFX Va ser s/V1vS [aeiou]ser
SFX Va xer x/V1vS [aeiou]xer
SFX Va cer z/V1vS [aeiou]cer
SFX Va er emos er
SFX Va er émos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Va er éis/V9V0 er
SFX Va er en/vS er
SFX Va ir o/LlvM [^ucü]ir
SFX Va ir yo/LlvM [^qg]uir
SFX Va quir co/LlvM quir
SFX Va guir go/LlvM guir
SFX Va cir zo/LlvM cir
SFX Va üir uo/LlvM üir
SFX Va ir es/vT [^u]ir
SFX Va uir úis/vT [^gq]uir
SFX Va quir ques/vT quir
SFX Va guir gues/vT guir 
SFX Va ir e/LlvS [^lrscaeou]ir
SFX Va uir úi/LlvS [^qg]uir
SFX Va ir e/LlvS [qg]uir
SFX Va ir e/LlvS [^aeou]lir
SFX Va ir e/LlvS [^aeou]rir
SFX Va ir e/LlvS [^aeiou]sir
SFX Va ir e/LlvS [^aeiou]cir
SFX Va lir l/V1vS [aeou]lir
SFX Va rir r/V1vS [aeou]rir
SFX Va sir s/V1vS [aeiou]sir
SFX Va xir x/V1vS [aeiou]xir
SFX Va cir z/V1vS [aeiou]cir
SFX Va ir imos ir
SFX Va ir ímos/XxV5V6 ir
SFX Va ir ís/V9V0 ir
SFX Va ir en/vS [^u]ir
SFX Va uir úin/vS [^qg]uir
SFX Va ir en/vS [qg]uir
SFX Va abar ábes/XxV7V8 abar
SFX Va abar ába/XxV1V2 abar
SFX Va abar áben/XxV1V2 abar
SFX Va abar ában/XxV1V2 abar
SFX Va abiar ábies/XxV7V8 abiar
SFX Va abiar ábia/XxV1V2 abiar
SFX Va abiar ábien/XxV1V2 abiar
SFX Va abiar ábian/XxV1V2 abiar
SFX Va ablar ábles/XxV7V8 ablar
SFX Va ablar ábla/XxV1V2 ablar
SFX Va ablar áblen/XxV1V2 ablar
SFX Va ablar áblan/XxV1V2 ablar
SFX Va abrar ábres/XxV7V8 abrar
SFX Va abrar ábra/XxV1V2 abrar
SFX Va abrar ábren/XxV1V2 abrar
SFX Va abrar ábran/XxV1V2 abrar
SFX Va abriar ábries/XxV7V8 abriar
SFX Va abriar ábria/XxV1V2 abriar
SFX Va abriar ábrien/XxV1V2 abriar
SFX Va abriar ábrian/XxV1V2 abriar
SFX Va acar áques/XxV7V8 acar
SFX Va acar áca/XxV1V2 acar
SFX Va acar áquen/XxV1V2 acar
SFX Va acar ácan/XxV1V2 acar
SFX Va achar áches/XxV7V8 achar
SFX Va achar ácha/XxV1V2 achar
SFX Va achar áchen/XxV1V2 achar
SFX Va achar áchan/XxV1V2 achar
SFX Va aciar ácies/XxV7V8 aciar
SFX Va aciar ácia/XxV1V2 aciar
SFX Va aciar ácien/XxV1V2 aciar
SFX Va aciar ácian/XxV1V2 aciar
SFX Va acrar ácres/XxV7V8 acrar
SFX Va acrar ácra/XxV1V2 acrar
SFX Va acrar ácren/XxV1V2 acrar
SFX Va acrar ácran/XxV1V2 acrar
SFX Va actar áctes/XxV7V8 actar
SFX Va actar ácta/XxV1V2 actar
SFX Va actar ácten/XxV1V2 actar
SFX Va actar áctan/XxV1V2 actar
SFX Va actuar áctua/XxV1V2 actuar
SFX Va actuar áctuan/XxV1V2 actuar
SFX Va acuar ácua/XxV1V2 acuar
SFX Va acuar ácuan/XxV1V2 acuar
SFX Va adar ádes/XxV7V8 adar
SFX Va adar áda/XxV1V2 adar
SFX Va adar áden/XxV1V2 adar
SFX Va adar ádan/XxV1V2 adar
SFX Va adiar ádies/XxV7V8 adiar
SFX Va adiar ádia/XxV1V2 adiar
SFX Va adiar ádien/XxV1V2 adiar
SFX Va adiar ádian/XxV1V2 adiar
SFX Va adrar ádres/XxV7V8 adrar
SFX Va adrar ádra/XxV1V2 adrar
SFX Va adrar ádren/XxV1V2 adrar
SFX Va adrar ádran/XxV1V2 adrar
SFX Va adriar ádries/XxV7V8 adriar
SFX Va adriar ádria/XxV1V2 adriar
SFX Va adriar ádrien/XxV1V2 adriar
SFX Va adriar ádrian/XxV1V2 adriar
SFX Va aduar ádua/XxV1V2 aduar
SFX Va aduar áduan/XxV1V2 aduar
SFX Va afar áfes/XxV7V8 afar
SFX Va afar áfa/XxV1V2 afar
SFX Va afar áfen/XxV1V2 afar
SFX Va afar áfan/XxV1V2 afar
SFX Va afiar áfies/XxV7V8 afiar
SFX Va afiar áfia/XxV1V2 afiar
SFX Va afiar áfien/XxV1V2 afiar
SFX Va afiar áfian/XxV1V2 afiar
SFX Va afrar áfres/XxV7V8 afrar
SFX Va afrar áfra/XxV1V2 afrar
SFX Va afrar áfren/XxV1V2 afrar
SFX Va afrar áfran/XxV1V2 afrar
SFX Va afriar áfries/XxV7V8 afriar
SFX Va afriar áfria/XxV1V2 afriar
SFX Va afriar áfrien/XxV1V2 afriar
SFX Va afriar áfrian/XxV1V2 afriar
SFX Va agar águes/XxV7V8 agar
SFX Va agar ága/XxV1V2 agar
SFX Va agar águen/XxV1V2 agar
SFX Va agar ágan/XxV1V2 agar
SFX Va agrar ágres/XxV7V8 agrar
SFX Va agrar ágra/XxV1V2 agrar
SFX Va agrar ágren/XxV1V2 agrar
SFX Va agrar ágran/XxV1V2 agrar
SFX Va agriar ágries/XxV7V8 agriar
SFX Va agriar ágria/XxV1V2 agriar
SFX Va agriar ágrien/XxV1V2 agriar
SFX Va agriar ágrian/XxV1V2 agriar
SFX Va aguar ágües/XxV7V8 aguar
SFX Va aguar água/XxV1V2 aguar
SFX Va aguar ágüen/XxV1V2 aguar
SFX Va aguar águan/XxV1V2 aguar
SFX Va ah.ar áh.es/XxV7V8 ah.ar
SFX Va ah.ar áh.a/XxV1V2 ah.ar
SFX Va ah.ar áh.en/XxV1V2 ah.ar
SFX Va ah.ar áh.an/XxV1V2 ah.ar
SFX Va aidar áides/XxV7V8 aidar
SFX Va aidar áida/XxV1V2 aidar
SFX Va aidar áiden/XxV1V2 aidar
SFX Va aidar áidan/XxV1V2 aidar
SFX Va ailar áiles/XxV7V8 ailar
SFX Va ailar áila/XxV1V2 ailar
SFX Va ailar áilen/XxV1V2 ailar
SFX Va ailar áilan/XxV1V2 ailar
SFX Va aillar áilles/XxV7V8 aillar
SFX Va aillar áilla/XxV1V2 aillar
SFX Va aillar áillen/XxV1V2 aillar
SFX Va aillar áillan/XxV1V2 aillar
SFX Va ainar áines/XxV7V8 ainar
SFX Va ainar áina/XxV1V2 ainar
SFX Va ainar áinen/XxV1V2 ainar
SFX Va ainar áinan/XxV1V2 ainar
SFX Va airar áires/XxV7V8 airar
SFX Va airar áira/XxV1V2 airar
SFX Va airar áiren/XxV1V2 airar
SFX Va airar áiran/XxV1V2 airar
SFX Va airiar áiries/XxV7V8 airiar
SFX Va airiar áiria/XxV1V2 airiar
SFX Va airiar áirien/XxV1V2 airiar
SFX Va airiar áirian/XxV1V2 airiar
SFX Va aislar áisles/XxV7V8 aislar
SFX Va aislar áisla/XxV1V2 aislar
SFX Va aislar áislen/XxV1V2 aislar
SFX Va aislar áislan/XxV1V2 aislar
SFX Va aisllar áislles/XxV7V8 aisllar
SFX Va aisllar áislla/XxV1V2 aisllar
SFX Va aisllar áisllen/XxV1V2 aisllar
SFX Va aisllar áisllan/XxV1V2 aisllar
SFX Va aitar áites/XxV7V8 aitar
SFX Va aitar áita/XxV1V2 aitar
SFX Va aitar áiten/XxV1V2 aitar
SFX Va aitar áitan/XxV1V2 aitar
SFX Va aitiar áities/XxV7V8 aitiar
SFX Va aitiar áitia/XxV1V2 aitiar
SFX Va aitiar áitien/XxV1V2 aitiar
SFX Va aitiar áitian/XxV1V2 aitiar
SFX Va aizar áices/XxV7V8 aizar
SFX Va aizar áiza/XxV1V2 aizar
SFX Va aizar áicen/XxV1V2 aizar
SFX Va aizar áizan/XxV1V2 aizar
SFX Va alar áles/XxV7V8 alar
SFX Va alar ála/XxV1V2 alar
SFX Va alar álen/XxV1V2 alar
SFX Va alar álan/XxV1V2 alar
SFX Va albar álbes/XxV7V8 albar
SFX Va albar álba/XxV1V2 albar
SFX Va albar álben/XxV1V2 albar
SFX Va albar álban/XxV1V2 albar
SFX Va albiar álbies/XxV7V8 albiar
SFX Va albiar álbia/XxV1V2 albiar
SFX Va albiar álbien/XxV1V2 albiar
SFX Va albiar álbian/XxV1V2 albiar
SFX Va alcar álques/XxV7V8 alcar
SFX Va alcar álca/XxV1V2 alcar
SFX Va alcar álquen/XxV1V2 alcar
SFX Va alcar álcan/XxV1V2 alcar
SFX Va alcriar álcries/XxV7V8 alcriar
SFX Va alcriar álcria/XxV1V2 alcriar
SFX Va alcriar álcrien/XxV1V2 alcriar
SFX Va alcriar álcrian/XxV1V2 alcriar
SFX Va aldar áldes/XxV7V8 aldar
SFX Va aldar álda/XxV1V2 aldar
SFX Va aldar álden/XxV1V2 aldar
SFX Va aldar áldan/XxV1V2 aldar
SFX Va aldiar áldies/XxV7V8 aldiar
SFX Va aldiar áldia/XxV1V2 aldiar
SFX Va aldiar áldien/XxV1V2 aldiar
SFX Va aldiar áldian/XxV1V2 aldiar
SFX Va aldrar áldres/XxV7V8 aldrar
SFX Va aldrar áldra/XxV1V2 aldrar
SFX Va aldrar áldren/XxV1V2 aldrar
SFX Va aldrar áldran/XxV1V2 aldrar
SFX Va alfar álfes/XxV7V8 alfar
SFX Va alfar álfa/XxV1V2 alfar
SFX Va alfar álfen/XxV1V2 alfar
SFX Va alfar álfan/XxV1V2 alfar
SFX Va alfiar álfies/XxV7V8 alfiar
SFX Va alfiar álfia/XxV1V2 alfiar
SFX Va alfiar álfien/XxV1V2 alfiar
SFX Va alfiar álfian/XxV1V2 alfiar
SFX Va algar álgues/XxV7V8 algar
SFX Va algar álga/XxV1V2 algar
SFX Va algar álguen/XxV1V2 algar
SFX Va algar álgan/XxV1V2 algar
SFX Va aliar álies/XxV7V8 aliar
SFX Va aliar ália/XxV1V2 aliar
SFX Va aliar álien/XxV1V2 aliar
SFX Va aliar álian/XxV1V2 aliar
SFX Va allar álles/XxV7V8 allar
SFX Va allar álla/XxV1V2 allar
SFX Va allar állen/XxV1V2 allar
