extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
abisagrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
abueldase/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acarambelar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
achinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acomuñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acubilar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aduechar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aflacar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afutar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aguaitar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alcanzar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
alliciar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amaciñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amazapiellar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amorenar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
anarbasar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
anubar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apanfilar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apellar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apilongar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aporricar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aquexumar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arramascar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrefilar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arrigar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
asechar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aspiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ateclar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atopar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
atrosar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aviciayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
azorar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
barbuyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
bizcortar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
burbuxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
caletrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
capitoniar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
catequizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
chapicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
chorriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
claudicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
compadrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
consiguir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
corcuxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cubilar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
declarar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
derrosar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desagafar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desapastoriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desatranguzar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desconocer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desencabritar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desenllabanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desfilar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desordenar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desvivir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
dividir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
embanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emborronar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empañar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
emperrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enanchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encantrellar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encerrizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encorniar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enemistar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engachar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
engorbesar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enllagar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enrachar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ensareyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entesacar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
entrepechar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
envizcarrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ermar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esberriciar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escaceyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escamochar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escarecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escazoplar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esconchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escuaxeringar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esfañicar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esformiguexar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgaritar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esgurgumillar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmasuñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmozquetar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espanguar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espaxarigar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espigar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esprecetar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estapinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estopar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estromberar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
eszarabatiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
farriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
flaquiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
frañar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
galdrir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
goldrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
guarnecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
illegalizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
instruir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
llamber/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
llibar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
macizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
mañecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
mechinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
moldiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
naguar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
nublinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
ordenar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
papar/SmNmYsVaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
pedriscar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
picaciar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
plisar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
presaxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
putiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rancir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rebinchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
reconocer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
reformar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
remellar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
repletar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
respirar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
reverenciar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rociar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
serpollar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sorrayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tarmiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
trabucar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
trufar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
vocexar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
zampar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
